New York, session 2025-2026, S1316.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 19-a to read as follows: 3 19-a. The commissioner shall promulgate procedures and guidelines by 4 which all elementary and secondary school science laboratories shall be 5 operated and maintained to protect the safety of students, teachers and 6 staff. Such procedures and guidelines shall include, at a minimum, 7 classroom and laboratory inspection, maintenance, storage and usage of 8 safety equipment, maintenance, storage and usage of science laboratory 9 materials and equipment, safety and health training for school employ- 10 ees, and procedures to be followed in the event of an injury or acci- 11 dent, and shall be consistent with all other applicable federal or state 12 safety regulations. The commissioner is authorized to direct any or all 13 elementary and secondary schools to temporarily or indefinitely cease 14 using materials or equipment or conducting science demonstrations or 15 student laboratory exercises that the commissioner has determined pose 16 an undue risk of harm to students, teachers or staff. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04303-01-5